createYaml/yaml_output/VTI_IND_TI3.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiiminaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiiminaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijisiininaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0PlO: nimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: omiijisiininaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO: nimiijiminaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gimiijiminaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijinaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijininaadog
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0PlO: nimiijiminaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gimiijiminaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijinaawaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijinaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijinaawaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: omiijininaadogenan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaa
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaa
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijisiinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijisiinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0PlO: nimiijisiimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gimiijisiimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijisiinaawaan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijisiinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaawaan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO: nimiijimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gimiijimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaa
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaa
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0PlO: nimiijimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gimiijimin
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijinaawaan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijinan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijinaawaan
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiiminaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiiminaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijisiininaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [nimiijisiinaabaniin,nimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gimiijisiinaabaniin,gimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [nimiijisiiminaabaniin,nimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gimiijisiiminaabaniin,gimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gimiijisiinaawaabaniin,gimiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [omiijisiinaabaniin,omiijisiinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [omiijisiinaawaabaniin,omiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijisiininaabaniin,omiijisiininaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO: nimiijiminaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gimiijiminaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijinaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijininaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [nimiijinaabaniin,nimiijinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gimiijinaabaniin,gimiijinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [nimiijiminaabaniin,nimiijiminaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gimiijiminaabaniin,gimiijiminaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gimiijinaawaabaniin,gimiijinaawaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [omiijinaabaniin,omiijinaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [omiijinaawaabaniin,omiijinaawaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijininaabaniin,omiijininaabanen]
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigoban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigwaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiinigoban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigoban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigwaaban
     miijim+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijinigoban
